Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-171
Platte.

The county of Platte is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point on the east line of township 16 north, range 1 east, said point being 3711.01 feet south of the northeast corner of section 1, of said township, and assuming the east line of said section 1 to have a bearing of N 02° 06′ 22″ E; thence N 70° 23′ 02″ W, 3275.26 feet; thence N 45° 07′ 33″ W, 3033.40 feet; thence N 53° 29′ 12″ W, 3663.43 feet; thence N 73° 40′ 09″ W, 2182.88 feet; thence S 87° 03′ 33″ W, 2685.73 feet; thence S 74° 49′ 57″ W, 4926.62 feet; thence S 64° 42′ 15″ W, 5633.14 feet; thence N 70° 16′ 39″ W, 3725.32 feet; thence N 70° 17′ 54″ W, 5359.26 feet, to a point on the west line of township 17 north, range 1 east, said point being 904.43 feet north of the southwest corner of said township, thence south to the south bank of the main channel of the Platte River; thence west along said south bank to its intersection with the line dividing ranges 2 and 3 west; thence north by said line to the northwest corner of township 16 north, of range 2 west; thence west on the 4th standard parallel to the eastern boundary of the former Pawnee Indian Reservation; thence west and north by the boundaries of said reservation to the line dividing ranges 4 and 5 west; thence north to the northwest corner of township 20 north, of range 4 west; thence east by the 5th standard parallel to the line dividing ranges 1 and 2 east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 43, p. 220;

R.S.1913, § 886;

C.S.1922, § 788;

C.S.1929, § 25-175;

R.S.1943, § 22-171;

Laws 2000, LB 349, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 90, § 3.